Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Capital Improvements Preplanning Fund

§§ 7-9-151 through 7-9-159.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 6, effective July 1, 2014.

§7-9-151. [Laws, 1994, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 408, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]

§7-9-153. [Laws, 1994, ch. 529, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 408, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]

§7-9-155. [Laws, 1994, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]

§7-9-157. [Laws, 1994, ch. 529, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]

§7-9-159. [Laws, 1994, ch. 529, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2011.]

§ 7-9-161.
Repeal of §§ 7-9-151 through 7-9-159.

Sections 7-9-151 through 7-9-159, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be repealed on July 1, 2014.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 531, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 375, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 474, § 6; Laws, 2006, ch. 410, § 6; Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 22, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 400, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2011.